da: Dykkercomputerartikler medfølger: Transmitter; Andet
bg-BG: Включени елементи за компютър за гмуркане: Предавател; Други
sk-SK: Položky potápačského počítača v cene: Vysielač; Iné
zh-TW: 包含潛水電腦錶品項: 發射器; 其他
ja: ダイブコンピュータ付属品: 送信機; その他
ro-RO: Articole computer pentru scufundări incluse: Transmițător; Altele
el: Περιεχόμενα συσκευασίας υπολογιστή κατάδυσης: Πομπός; Άλλο
sv: Dykdatorartiklar som ingår: Transmitter; Övrigt
fi: Mukana sukellustietokonetarvikkeet: Lähetin; Muu
sl-SI: Priloženi deli potapljaškega računalnika: Oddajnik; Drugo
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys nardymo kompiuterio elementai: Siųstuvas; Kita
th: รวมอุปกรณ์ไดฟ์คอมพิวเตอร์: ทรานสมิตเตอร์; อื่นๆ
pl: Elementy komputera nurkowego w zestawie: Nadajnik; Inne
tr: Dalış bilgisayarı öğeleri dahil: Verici; Diğer
vi: Bao gồm các vật dụng máy tính đi lặn: Hệ thống điều khiển; Khác
es: Artículos de ordenador de buceo incluidos: Transmisor; Otros
zh-CN: 包含潜水电脑物品: 发射器; 其他
pt-PT: Itens de computador de mergulho incluídos: Transmissor; Outro
nl: Duikcomputerartikelen inbegrepen: Zender; Andere
cs: Obsažené položky potápěčského počítače: Vysílač; Jiné
de: Tauchcomputer-Artikel inbegriffen: Sender; Sonstiges
fr: Articles d’ordinateur de plongée inclus: Émetteur; Autre
pt-BR: Itens de medidor de descompressão incluídos: Transmissor; Outro
it: Articoli per computer subacqueo inclusi: Trasmettitore; Altro
ko: 다이브 컴퓨터 품목 포함: 송신기; 기타
nb: Dykkecomputer inkludert: Transmitter; Annet
en: Dive computer items included: Transmitter; Other
hr-HR: Stavke uključene uz ronilačko računalo: Odašiljač; Ostalo
hu: A tartalmazott búvárkomputer-tartozékok: Jeladó; Egyéb
ru: Комплект поставки компьютера для дайвинга: Передатчик; Другой